tr: Şim amacı: Açılı takoz; Kilit kaması; Uzatma plakası; Düz şim; Ön ayak kaması; Topuk yükseltici; Bacak uzunluğu şimi; Metatarsal düğme; İstif ara parçası; Diğer
ko: 심 용도: 앵글 웨지; 클리트 웨지; 익스텐더 플레이트; 플랫 심; 앞발 웨지; 힐 리프트; 다리 길이 심; 중족골 버튼; 스택 스페이서; 기타
ru: Назначение регулировочной проставки: Угловой клин; Клин для шипа; Пластина-удлинитель; Плоская прокладка; Клин для передней части стопы; Подпяточник; Прокладка для компенсации длины ноги; Метатарзальный валик; Проставка для высоты; Другое
da: Shim-formål: Vinklet kile; Klampekile; Forlængerplade; Fladt mellemlæg; Forfodskile; Hælløft; Benlængdekile; Forfodspelotte; Stack-spacer; Andet
lt-LT: Tarpinės paskirtis: Kampinis pleištas; Plokštelės pleištas; Pailginimo plokštelė; Plokščias tarpiklis; Priekinės pėdos dalies pleištas; Kulno pakėlimas; Kojos ilgio kompensavimo tarpiklis; Padikaulio pagalvėlė; Aukščio reguliavimo tarpiklis; Kita
hu: Hézagoló alátét funkciója: Döntött ék; Stopliék; Hosszabbító lemez; Lapos hézagoló; Elülső talpék; Sarokemelő; Lábhossz-kiegyenlítő; Harántemelő párna; Távtartó elem; Egyéb
nb: Mellomleggets formål: Vinklet kile; Klossekile; Forlengelsesplate; Flat skive; Forfotkile; Hælløfter; Benlengdeskive; Metatarsalknapp; Stack-avstandsstykke; Annet
el: Σκοπός αντάπτορα: Κεκλιμένη σφήνα; Σφήνα σχαρακίου; Πλάκα επέκτασης; Επίπεδος αποστάτης; Σφήνα μπροστινού μέρους πέλματος; Ανύψωση φτέρνας; Αποστάτης μήκους ποδιού; Μετατάρσιο μαξιλαράκι; Αποστάτης ύψους; Άλλο
zh-CN: 垫片用途: 倾斜楔形垫片; 锁片楔形垫片; 延长板; 平垫片; 前脚掌楔形垫片; 脚跟垫高垫片; 腿长补足垫片; 跖骨垫; 堆叠垫片; 其他
vi: Mục đích của miếng đệm: Chêm góc; Chêm can; Đệm mở rộng; Chêm phẳng; Chêm mũi chân; Nâng gót; Chêm bù chiều dài chân; Đệm xương bàn chân; Miếng đệm chêm; Khác
sk-SK: Účel vymedzovacej podložky: Uhlový klin; Klin pod zarážku; Predlžovacia doštička; Plochá podložka; Klin pod prednú časť chodidla; Podložka pod pätu; Podložka na vyrovnanie dĺžky nôh; Metatarzálna podložka; Vymedzovacia podložka; Iné
it: Scopo dello spessore: Spessore angolato; Spessore per tacchette; Piastra di estensione; Spessore piatto; Spessore per avampiede; Alzatacco; Spessore per lunghezza gamba; Pulsante metatarsale; Distanziatore di rialzo; Altro
cs: Účel podložky: Úhlový klín; Klín pod zarážku; Prodlužovací podložka; Plochá podložka; Klín pod přední část nohy; Podpatěnka; Podložka pro vyrovnání délky nohou; Metatarzální srdíčko; Distanční podložka (stack); Jiné
fr: Fonction de la cale: Cale inclinée; Cale sous cale; Plaque d’extension; Cale plate; Cale d’avant-pied; Talonnette; Cale de compensation de longueur de jambe; Bouton métatarsien; Entretoise d’empilement; Autre
hr-HR: Svrha podložne pločice: Kutni klinasti podložak; Klinasti podložak za blokeje; Produžna pločica; Ravni podložak; Klinasti podložak za prednji dio stopala; Povišenje za petu; Podložak za duljinu noge; Metatarzalni jastučić; Odstojnik za visinu; Drugo
en: Shim purpose: Angled wedge; Cleat wedge; Extender plate; Flat shim; Forefoot wedge; Heel lift; Leg length shim; Metatarsal button; Stack spacer; Other
nl: Shim doel: Schuine wig; Schoenplaatwig; Verlengplaat; Platte shim; Voorvoetwig; Hielverhoging; Beenlengteshim; Metatarsale pelotte; Stack-spacer; Overig
bg-BG: Предназначение на шайбата: Ъглов клин; Клин за парчета; Удължителна планка; Плоска подложка; Клин за предната част на стъпалото; Повдигане на петата; Подложка за дължина на крака; Метатарзална подложка; Дистанционер за височина; Друго
sl-SI: Namen distančnika: Kotna zagozda; Zagozda za blokeje; Podaljševalna plošča; Ravna podložka; Zagozda za sprednji del stopala; Dvig pete; Podložka za dolžino noge; Metatarzalna blazinica; Distančnik za višino; Drugo
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของชิม: ลิ่มปรับมุม; ลิ่มเสริมคลีท; แผ่นเสริมต่อขยาย; แผ่นชิมแบบเรียบ; ลิ่มเสริมปลายเท้า; เสริมส้น; แผ่นชิมปรับความยาวขา; ปุ่มหนุนฝ่าเท้า; แหวนรองซ้อน; อื่นๆ
ja: シムの用途: 角度付きウェッジ; クリートウェッジ; エクステンダープレート; フラットシム; フォアフットウェッジ; ヒールリフト; 脚長差シム; 中足骨ボタン; スタックスペーサー; その他
pt-BR: Calço finalidade: Cunha angular; Cunha para taco; Placa extensora; Calço plano; Cunha para o antepé; Elevador de calcanhar; Calço para comprimento de perna; Botão metatarsal; Espaçador de pilha; Outros
sv: Syfte med shims: Vinklad kil; Klosskil; Förlängningsplatta; Platt mellanlägg; Framfotskil; Hällyft; Benlängdskil; Metatarsalkudde; Höjningsbricka; Övrigt
pt-PT: Finalidade da caneleira: Calço angulado; Calço de travessa; Placa extensora; Calço plano; Calço para antepé; Elevação de calcanhar; Calço de comprimento de perna; Botão metatársico; Espaçador de elevação; Outro
fi: Välilevyn tarkoitus: Kulmakiila; Klossikiila; Jatkelevy; Tasainen aluslevy; Päkiäkiila; Kantakorotus; Jalan pituuden säätölevy; Jalkapöydän pehmuste; Pinottava välikappale; Muu
zh-TW: 墊片用途: 角度楔墊; 扣片楔墊; 延長板; 平面墊片; 前掌楔墊; 足跟墊; 腿長墊片; 蹠骨墊; 堆疊墊圈; 其他
de: Zweck der Unterlegscheibe: Abgewinkelter Keil; Cleat-Keil; Verlängerungsplatte; Flacher Shim; Vorfußkeil; Fersenerhöhung; Beinlängen-Shim; Mittelfußpolster; Stack-Spacer; Sonstige
ro-RO: Scop al distanțierului: Pană înclinată; Pană pentru plăcuțe; Plăcuță de extensie; Distanțier plat; Pană pentru antepicior; Înălțător pentru călcâi; Distanțier pentru lungimea piciorului; Pad metatarsal; Distanțier de înălțare; Altele
pl: Przeznaczenie podkładki regulacyjnej: Podkładka kątowa; Klin do bloków; Płytka przedłużająca; Płaska podkładka; Klin pod przodostopie; Podpiętka; Podkładka wyrównująca długość nóg; Pelota metatarsalna; Podkładka dystansowa; Inne
es: Propósito de la cuña: Cuña en ángulo; Cuña para cala; Placa extensora; Cuña plana; Cuña para el antepié; Alza para el talón; Espaciador de longitud de pierna; Botón metatarsiano; Espaciador de apilamiento; Otro